District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4607

Violations of §§ 22-4602 to 22-4606 where value of property less than $100

Repealed.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 602(e)-(o), 29 DCR 3976

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-1201 to 22-1211.